Massachusetts, session 194th, S2484.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Section 98A of chapter 272 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after each instance of the words “physically 
handicapped persons” appearing  lines 3, 10, and 15 the following words:- or veteran. 
SECTION 2. The first paragraph of section 92A of chapter 272, as appearing in section 1, 
chapter 134 of the acts of 2016, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “disability” the 
following words:- or veteran status. 
SECTION 3. Section 98 of chapter 272 of the General Laws, as appearing in section 3, 
chapter 134 of the acts of 2016, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “ancestry” the 
following words:- or veteran status.